sv: Detaljer för borr: Justerbar hastighet; Justerbart vridmoment; Borrning i ilska; Inbyggd belysning; Hammarborrning; Skruvning; Övrigt
da: Borefunktioner: Justerbar hastighed; Justerbart moment; Hammerboring; Indbygget belysning; Hammerboring; Skruning; Andet
ja: ドリルフィーチャー: スピード調整可能; トルク調整可能; ハンマードリル; 照明内蔵; ハンマードリル; ネジ止め; その他
sl-SI: Lastnosti vrtalnika: Nastavljiva hitrost; Nastavljiv navor; Vrtanje v zemljo; Vgrajena razsvetljava; Vrtanje v zemljo; Vijačenje; Drugo
de: Bohrfunktionen: Einstellbare Geschwindigkeit; Einstellbares Drehmoment; Anger Bohren; Integrierte Beleuchtung; Bohrhämmern; Schrauben; Sonstiges
pl: Charakterystyka wiertarki: Regulowana prędkość; Regulowany moment obrotowy; Wiercenie świdrem śrubowym; Wbudowane oświetlenie; Wiercenie udarowe; Wkręcanie; Inne
cs: Vlastnosti vrtačky: Nastavitelná rychlost; Nastavitelný točivý moment; Vrtání s příklepem; Vestavěné osvětlení; Vrtání s příklepem; Šroubování; Jiné
nl: Kenmerken boor: Instelbare snelheid; Instelbare torsie; Woede boren; Ingebouwde verlichting; Hamerboren; Schroeven; Andere
ro-RO: Caracteristici burghiu: Viteză reglabilă; Cuplu reglabil; Foraj în condiții dificile; Iluminat integrat; Foraj cu ciocan; Înșurubare; Altele
zh-CN: 钻机特点: 可调速度; 可调转矩; 角钻; 内置照明设备; 冲击式凿岩; 螺旋起子; 其他
tr: Matkap özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir hız; Ayarlanabilir tork; Açılı delme; Dahili aydınlatma; Darbeli delme; Vidalama; Diğer
sk-SK: Funkcie vŕtačky: Nastaviteľná rýchlosť; Nastaviteľný krútiaci moment; Vykopávací; Vstavané osvetlenie; Vŕtanie s príklepom; Skrutkovanie; Iné
pt-PT: Características de perfuração: Velocidade ajustável; Binário ajustável; Perfuração com martelo; Iluminação integrada; Perfuração com martelo; Aparafusar; Outro
pt-BR: Recursos de perfuração: Velocidade ajustável; Torque ajustável; Perfuração com verruma; Iluminação embutida; Perfuração com martelo; Aparafusamento; Outro
vi: Tính năng khoan: Điều chỉnh được tốc độ; Điều chỉnh được mô-men xoắn; Khoan mạnh; Có đèn sáng; Khoan búa; Vặn vít; Khác
hr-HR: Značajke bušilice: Podesiva brzina; Podesivi zakretni moment; Svrdlanje; Ugrađena rasvjeta; Udarno bušenje; Odvijanje/zavijanje vijaka; Ostalo
th: คุณลักษณะของสว่าน: ปรับความเร็วได้; ปรับแรงบิดได้; การเจาะดิน; มีไฟในตัว; การใช้สว่านเจาะกระแทก; การขันสกรู; อื่นๆ
hu: Fúró jellemzői: Állítható sebesség; Állítható nyomaték; Anger-fúrás; Beépített világítás; Fúrókalapács; Csavarozás; Egyéb
fi: Poran ominaisuudet: Säädettävä nopeus; Säädettävä vääntömomentti; Kairapora; Sisäänrakennettu valaistus; Vasaraporaus; Ruuvaus; Muu
es: Características del taladro: Velocidad regulable; Par regulable; Perforación con barrena; Iluminación incorporada; Perforación con percusión; Atornillado; Otros
bg-BG: Характеристики на бормашината: Регулируема скорост; Регулируем въртящ момент; Ангерно пробиване; Вградено осветление; Ударно пробиване; Завинтване; Други
ko: 드릴 기능: 조절식 속도; 조절식 토크; 앵거 드릴링; 내장 조명; 해머 드릴링; 스크루드라이빙; 기타
it: Funzionalità del trapano: Velocità regolabile; Coppia regolabile; Perforazione della rabbia; Illuminazione incorporata; Trapani perforatori; Avvitamento; Altro
nb: Drillfunksjoner: Regulerbar hastighet; Regulerbart dreiemoment; Angerboring; Innebygd belysning; Hammerboring; Skruing; Annet
ru: Характеристики дрели: Регулируемая скорость; Регулируемый крутящий момент; Сверление; Встроенная подсветка; Ударное сверление; Завинчивание; Другой
zh-TW: 鑽頭特點: 速度可調; 扭矩可調; 憤怒鑽孔; 內建照明; 鎚鑽; 擰螺絲; 其他
lt-LT: Gręžtuvo ypatybės: Reguliuojamas greitis; Reguliuojamas sukimo momentas; Pykčio gręžimas; Integruotas apšvietimas; Smūginis gręžimas; Atsukimas; Kita
en: Drill features: Adjustable speed; Adjustable torque; Anger drilling; Built-in lighting; Hammer drilling; Screwdriving; Other
el: Χαρακτηριστικά τρυπανιού: Ρυθμιζόμενη ταχύτητα; Ρυθμιζόμενη ροπή; Διάτρηση anger; Ενσωματωμένος φωτισμός; Διάτρηση με σφυροτρύπανο; Βίδωμα; Άλλο
fr: Caractéristiques de la perceuse: Vitesse réglable; Couple réglable; Forage; Éclairage intégré; Perçage à percussion; Vissage; Autre